Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.270

City contracts to obtain sheriff's office law enforcement services—Layoffs—Notice—Time limitation for transfers.

When a city or town shall contract with the county sheriff's office for law enforcement services and as a result thereof lays off any employee who is eligible to transfer to the county sheriff's office pursuant to RCW 41.14.250 and 41.14.260, the city or town shall notify such employee of his or her right to so transfer and such employee shall have ninety days to transfer his or her employment to the county sheriff's office: PROVIDED, That any employee layed off [laid off] during the year prior to February 21, 1972 shall have ninety days after the effective date to transfer his or her employment.

[ 2012 c 117 s 19; 1972 ex.s. c 48 s 3.]